Utah statutes.
40-10-11.   Division action on permit application -- Requirements for
approval -- List of applicant's mining law violation -- Restoration of prime
farmland.
(1) (a) (i)  After a complete mining application and reclamation plan or a
revision or renewal of an application and plan is submitted to the division as
required by this chapter and the public is notified and given an opportunity
for a hearing as required by Section 40-10-13, the division shall grant,
require modification of, or deny the permit application.
(ii)  The division shall make its decision within a reasonable time set by the
division and notify the applicant in writing.
(b)  The applicant for a permit, or a revision of a permit shall have the
burden of establishing that the application is in compliance with all
requirements of this chapter.
(c)  Within 10 days after the granting of a permit, the division shall provide
to the local governmental officials in the local political subdivision in
which the area of affected land is located:
(i)  notification that a permit has been issued; and
(ii)  a description of the location of the land.
(2)  No permit or revision application shall be approved unless the
application affirmatively demonstrates and the division finds in writing on
the basis of the information set forth in the application, or from information
otherwise available which will be documented in the approval and made
available to the applicant, that:
(a)  the permit application is accurate and complete and that all requirements
of this chapter have been complied with;
(b)  the applicant has demonstrated that the reclamation requirements under
this chapter can be accomplished under the reclamation plan contained in the
permit application;
(c)  the assessment of the probable cumulative impact of all anticipated
mining in the area on the hydrologic balance specified in Subsection
40-10-10(2)(c) has been made by the division and the proposed operation has
been designed to prevent material damage to the hydrologic balance outside the
permit area;
(d)  the area proposed to be mined is not included within an area:
(i)  designated as unsuitable for surface coal mining pursuant to Section
40-10-24; or
(ii)  under study for this designation in an administrative proceeding
commenced under Subsection 40-10-24(2), unless the operator demonstrates that
prior to January 1, 1977, substantial legal and financial commitments were
made to the operation;
(e)  the proposed surface coal mining operation would not:
(i)  interrupt, discontinue, or preclude farming on alluvial valley floors
that are irrigated or naturally subirrigated other than on:
(A)  undeveloped range lands that are not significant to farming on alluvial
valley floors; or
(B)  lands which the division finds are of such small acreage that if farming
is interrupted, discontinued, or precluded, the impact on the farm's
agricultural production will be negligible; or
(ii)  materially damage the quantity or quality of water in surface or
underground water systems that supply alluvial valley floors specified in
Subsection (2)(e)(i), but this Subsection (2)(e) shall not affect those
surface coal mining operations which in the year preceding August 3, 1977,
produced coal in commercial quantities and were located within or adjacent to
alluvial valley floors or had obtained specific permit approval by the
division to conduct surface coal mining operations within these alluvial
valley floors; and
(f)  if the private mineral estate has been severed from the private surface
estate, the applicant has submitted to the division:
(i)  the written consent of the surface owner to the extraction of coal by
surface mining methods provided that nothing in this Subsection (2) shall be
construed to:
(A)  increase or diminish any property right established under the laws of the
state; or
(B)  authorize the board or division to adjudicate property right disputes;
(ii)  a conveyance that expressly grants or reserves the right to extract the
coal by surface mining methods; or
(iii)  documentation consistent with state law that establishes the status of
the surface-subsurface legal relationship.
(3) (a) (i)  The applicant shall file with the permit application a list of
any notices of violations of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of
1977 or its implementing regulations, this chapter, any state or federal
program or law approved under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act
of 1977, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 1201 et seq., and any law, rule, or regulation of the
United States, State of Utah, or any department or agency in the United States
pertaining to air or water environmental protection incurred by the applicant
in connection with any surface coal mining operation during the three-year
period prior to the date of application.
(ii)  The list required in Subsection (3)(a)(i) shall also indicate the final
resolution of any notice of violation.
(b)  If the list or other information available to the division indicates that
any surface coal mining operation owned or controlled by the applicant is
currently in violation of this chapter or other laws and regulations referred
to in this Subsection (3), the permit shall not be issued until the applicant
submits proof that the violation has been corrected or is in the process of
being corrected to the satisfaction of the division, department, or agency
which has jurisdiction over the violation.
(c)  No permit shall be issued to an applicant after a finding by the board,
after opportunity for hearing, that the applicant, or the operator specified
in the application, controls or has controlled mining operations with a
demonstrated pattern of willful violations of this chapter, the Surface Mining
Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, 30 U.S.C. Sec. 1201 et seq., the
implementing federal regulations, any state or federal programs enacted under
the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act, or other provisions of the
approved Utah program of such nature and duration with such resulting
irreparable damage to the environment as to indicate an intent not to comply
with the provisions of this chapter.
(4) (a) (i)  In addition to finding the application in compliance with
Subsection (2), if the area proposed to be mined contains prime farmland
pursuant to division rules, the division shall grant a permit to mine on prime
farmland if the division finds in writing that the operator has the
technological capability to restore the mined area within a reasonable time to
an equivalent or higher level of yield as nonmined prime farmland in the
surrounding area under equivalent levels of management and can meet the soil
reconstruction standards specified in division rules.
(ii)  Except for compliance with Subsection (2), the requirements of this
subsection shall apply to all permits issued after August 3, 1977.
(b)  This Subsection (4) shall not apply to any permit issued prior to August
3, 1977, or to any revisions or renewals of the permit, or to any existing
surface mining operations for which a permit was issued prior to August 3,
1977.
(5) (a)  After October 24, 1992, the prohibition of Subsection (3) shall not
apply to a permit application if the violation resulted from an unanticipated
event or condition that occurred at a surface coal mining operation on lands
eligible for remining under a permit held by the person making the
application.
(b)  As used in this Subsection (5), the term "violation" has the same meaning
as the term has under Subsection (3).
